Georgia, session 2025_26, HB636.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF GEORGIA:
SECTION 1.
Chapter 6 of Title 16 of the Official Code of Georgia Annotated, relating to sexual offenses,
is amended by revising subsection (a) of Code Section 16-6-13, relating to penalties for
violating Code Sections 16-6-9 through 16-6-12, as follows:
"(a) Except as otherwise provided in subsection (b) of this Code section, a person
convicted of violating:
(1) Code Section 16-6-10 16-6-9 shall be punished as for a misdemeanor of a high and
aggravated nature, and at the sole discretion of the judge, all but 24 hours of any term of
imprisonment imposed may be suspended, stayed, or probated fined $75.00, and such
H. B. 636
- 1 -

LC 48 1414
collected fine shall be made available to the Department of Human Services for the Safe
Harbor for Sexually Exploited Children Fund Commission;
(2) Code Section 16-6-9 16-6-10 shall be punished as for a misdemeanor fined $75.00,
and such collected fine shall be made available to the Department of Human Services for
the Safe Harbor for Sexually Exploited Children Fund Commission;
(3) Code Section 16-6-11 for a:
(A) First offense shall be punished as for a misdemeanor of a high and aggravated
nature, and at the sole discretion of the judge, all but 72 hours of any term of
imprisonment imposed may be suspended, stayed, or probated fined $75.00, and such
collected fine shall be made available to the Department of Human Services for the
Safe Harbor for Sexually Exploited Children Fund Commission; and
(B) Second or subsequent offense shall be guilty of a felony and shall be punished by
a term of imprisonment of not less than one year nor more than ten years fined $100.00,
and such collected fine shall be made available to the Department of Human Services
for the Safe Harbor for Sexually Exploited Children Fund Commission; or
(4) Code Section 16-6-12 for a:
(A) First offense shall be punished as for a misdemeanor of a high and aggravated
nature, and at the sole discretion of the judge, all but 72 hours of any term of
imprisonment imposed may be suspended, stayed, or probated fined $75.00, and such
collected fine shall be made available to the Department of Human Services for the
Safe Harbor for Sexually Exploited Children Fund Commission; and
(B) Second or subsequent offense shall be guilty of a felony and shall be punished by
a term of imprisonment of not less than one year nor more than ten years fined $100.00,
and such collected fine shall be made available to the Department of Human Services
for the Safe Harbor for Sexually Exploited Children Fund Commission."
H. B. 636
- 2 -

LC 48 1414
SECTION 2.
All laws and parts of laws in conflict with this Act are repealed.
H. B. 636
- 3 -